Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142F.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program contingency appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) Up to $20,000,000 per week for up to six weeks is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families to be allocated to counties for distribution to Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) recipients if the following conditions are met: new text end new text begin (1) there is a full or partial federal government shutdown and appropriations to the United States Department of Agriculture have lapsed; and new text end new text begin (2) the federal SNAP contingency reserve fund has insufficient funds to cover the lapse in federal funding or the federal government does not release funds from the SNAP contingency reserve fund to the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall calculate the amount of each week's appropriation under paragraph (a) based on the total federal allocation of SNAP funds to Minnesota in the month prior to the appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) If the general fund balance is insufficient to cover the appropriation under paragraph (a), the commissioner of management and budget, in consultation with the commissioner of children, youth, and families, shall transfer the amount necessary to replace lapsed federal SNAP funds from the budget reserve under section 16A.152, subdivision 1a, to the general fund. new text end new text begin (d) Within 90 days of an appropriation under this subdivision, the commissioner shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over food support detailing state SNAP contingency appropriations and expenditures. new text end